Washington statutes.
RCW 38.60.040

Certification board—Duties.

Duties of the certification board include:

(1) Adopting bylaws for the certification board;

(2) Adopting rules, with the advice and assistance of the 911 advisory committee, to implement the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to, rules to implement a state-approved training program for process, policy, and procedure;

(3) Reviewing and approving state-approved training programs biennially. State-approved training programs should be consistent with industry standards;

(4) Setting all public safety telecommunicator certification, registration, and renewal fees, and to collect and deposit all such fees in the 911 account established under RCW 38.52.540; and

(5) Establishing recertification requirements.

[ 2022 c 286 s 4.]